portugues.dict
abstrato/fpmi
acabrunhado/mfp
adolescente/Epm
afetuoso/mdf
agricultura/prq
agrologia/qr
agudo/fpm
alternado/fpm
amargo/fmp
amplo/fpm
androfilia/q
androfobia/q
anfibiologia/q
anglofilia/pq
anglofobia/pq
anormal/pmd
antologia/pq
antropologia/qtr
aparente/pm
apicultura/prq
aracnofilia/q
arboricultura/prq
argumentativo/fpm
aristocracia/qr
arqueologia/rqt
artificial/pmid
arvicultura/pq
assiriologia/qt
astrofobia/q
astrologia/qr
atempado/fpm
atual/pmd
autobiografia/pq
autocracia/qr
autografia/q
avesso/fpmd
avicultura/prq
bacteriologia/qtr
bestial/pmd
bibliofilia/q
bibliofobia/q
bibliografia/pqr
bibliomania/q
biogeografia/pq
biografia/pqr
biologia/pq
brando/fpm
brasiliofobia/q
burocracia/qpr
cabal/mt
cafeicultura/pq
calcografia/pqr
caligrafia/pq
canicultura/pq
capaz/pdm
cardiopatia/pqr
cartografia/qr
casual/ptidm
cego/fplhm
cenografia/pqr
cerealicultura/prq
choroso/pmf
cinematografia/pqr
citricultura/prq
clamoroso/fpm
claustrofobia/pqr
cleptofobia/pq
cleptomania/pqr
climatologia/qrt
colateral/pdm
columbofilia/q
comparativo/fpm
complexo/fpmd
conceituoso/m
concomitante/pm
condicional/pidIm
consciencioso/fm
conselheiro/fpmi
constante/pm
contratual/mpm
convincente/pm
coprofilia/q
copulativo/fpm
coreografia/pqr
corporal/pmd
cosmografia/prq
cosmologia/pqrt
cotonicultura/pq
craniologia/qrt
crescente/pm
criminologia/prqt
criptografia/pqr
criptologia/qt
cristalografia/pqr
cromatografia/pqr
cronografia/prq
crucial/pm
crustaceologia/qt
cumulativo/mp
dactilografia/pqr
datilografia/pqr
decisivo/fpm
defensivo/fpm
delgado/fpm
demasiado/fpm
demografia/pqr
deontologia/qrt
dermatologia/qtr
descabido/fpm
desenvergonhado/fpm
despretensioso/fm
detalhado/pfm
dialetologia/prtq
difuso/pfm
direto/pfm
discografia/pq
ditatorial/pm
divino/pfm
duplo/fpm
eficaz/pmI
egiptologia/rtq
eleitoral/pmtiE
embasbacado/fpm
enfadonho/fpm
enologia/prq
entomologia/prqt
epigrafia/pq
epistolografia/pqr
equacional/pm
esbelto/pfm
escasso/fpm
espantoso/fpm
espeleologia/prqt
espetacular/pmd
estatal/pm
estomatologia/pqr
estrondoso/pfm
etimologia/pq
etnologia/qtr
evasivo/fpm
exaustivo/fdmp
exclusivo/pfmid
expedito/fmp
expresso/pfm
externo/pfm
fabuloso/fpm
farmacologia/pqrt
farto/fpm
feliz/pmds
filologia/pqr
fino/pflhms
fisiologia/qt
floricultura/prq
fonografia/pqr
forte/pmsp
fotografia/pqr
francofilia/q
froixo/fpm
fruticultura/prq
furioso/fpdm
galinicultura/pq
ginecologia/pqr
glorioso/fpm
gratuito/pfmd
heliografia/pq
hidrofilia/q
hidrografia/pqr
hipnologia/q
holografia/pq
homofobia/pqr
homossexual/idmp
horticultura/prq
iconofilia/q
ideologia/pq
ignorante/ptim
imenso/fpmd
impetuoso/fpdm
impune/mdp
incisivo/fpm
inculto/fpm
indiferente/pmti
indulgente/mp
infeliz/pmds
ingrato/fmp
inoportuno/mdfp
instrumental/pim
inteligente/pms
internacional/pmtid
invulgar/pm
judicioso/fpm
laudativo/mfp
lexicografia/pqr
licencioso/fpmd
litografia/pqr
longo/pfms
majestoso/fpm
maravilhoso/fpm
megalomania/pqr
melhor/pm
metodologia/pq
microfotografia/pqr
militante/pm
mitologia/pqr
monografia/pqr
moroso/fdm
musicologia/rqt
nebuloso/fdm
necrofobia/q
nefrologia/qtr
neuropatia/pqr
neutrofilia/pq
ninfomania/pqr
normal/pmtds
obsequioso/md
odontologia/qtr
oficial/pmidup
oleicultura/prq
original/pmds
ornitologia/qrt
ostreicultura/prq
paleografia/pqr
paleontologia/prqt
paralelo/pfmti
parapsicologia/qr
paternal/mitp
penitente/pmI
perseverante/mp
petrografia/pq
piromania/pqr
plutocracia/qr
pobre/pmz
pomicultura/prq
potencial/pmd
prejudicial/pm
primeiro/mfp
processual/pm
proibitivo/mf
prometedor/pfH
psicografia/pq
psicopatia/pqr
puro/pfmtis
radical/pmtidp
radiografia/pq
recursivo/pfmd
relutante/pm
reprografia/pq
resoluto/mfp
retrospetivo/fdm
rizicultura/prq
romanologia/q
rouco/pfm
sazonal/pmd
semanal/pm
serigrafia/pq
sexual/ptidm
silvicultura/prq
sinuoso/pfmd
sismologia/qr
sorrateiro/fpm
suficiente/pIm
suinicultura/prq
surdo/fpm
tecnofobia/pqr
telefotografia/pqr
temeroso/fpm
tentador/pfH
tentativo/fm
teocracia/qr
teratologia/prq
tomografia/pq
torrencial/pm
toxicologia/pqr
traidor/pfH
tremendo/fpm
urgente/pms
urologia/rtq
variado/pfms
violento/pfms
viticultura/prq
vulcanologia/prqt
xerografia/pq
zoologia/qtrp
académico/fpH
acessório/fpH
acrobático/fpH
admirável/pm
aleatório/fpH
alegórico/fpH
alfabético/fpH
analítico/fpH
apático/fpH
arbitrário/fpH
arboricídio/pq
artístico/fpH
assintático/pH
assistemático/fpH
autocrático/fpH
automático/fpH
axiomático/fpH
biológico/fpH
burocrático/fpH
básico/fpH
canónico/fpH
característico/fpH
caraterístico/fpH
carismático/fpH
categórico/fpH
científico/fpH
cinemático/fpH
cirúrgico/fpH
climático/fpH
colérico/fpH
conjugicídio/pq
contabilístico/fpH
contraditório/fpH
contrário/fpH
cromático/fpH
cronológico/fpH
crítico/fpH
decretório/fpH
democrático/fpAH
desejável/pIm
determinístico/pfH
diabólico/fpH
didático/fpH
diplomático/fpH
diário/pfHp
dogmático/fpH
dramático/fpH
drástico/fpH
dócil/Ha
ecológico/fpH
económico/pfH
ecuménico/fpH
eletrónico/pfH
elástico/fpH
emblemático/fpH
embriológico/pfH
empático/fpH
enfático/fpH
enigmático/fpH
entusiástico/pfH
episódico/pfH
específico/pfH
esquemático/fpH
estatutário/pfH
estatístico/pfH
estocástico/pfH
estático/fpH
estético/pfH
etimológico/fpH
extraordinário/pfH
fantástico/fpH
fanático/fpH
fictício/fpH
fisiológico/pfH
fleumático/fpH
fonológico/pfH
fonético/fpH
formicídio/pq
forçoso/m
frenético/pfH
genocídio/pq
genérico/pfH
genético/pfH
geográfico/pfH
geológico/pfH
gráfico/pfH
harmónico/fpH
hereditário/pfH
hermético/pfH
hierático/fpH
higiénico/fpHA
hiperbólico/fpH
hipotético/fpH
histérico/pfH
histórico/pfH
honorífico/fpH
humorístico/pfH
ideológico/fpH
ilusório/fpH
imaginário/pfH
imponderável/pmd
incompreensível/mdp
indiscutível/mdp
inexorável/dmp
infanticídio/pq
informático/fpH
inglório/pfH
inseparável/pdm
involuntário/fpH
irremediável/m
irónico/pfH
literário/fpH
logístico/fpH
lunático/fpH
lógico/pfH
magnético/fpfH
magnífico/pfH
maioritário/pfH
majestático/fpH
mediático/fpH
melodramático/fpH
metódico/fpH
monetário/fpH
morfológico/pfH
métrico/fpH
notório/fpH
obrigatório/pfHS
oratório/fpH
originário/pfH
pacífico/fpH
panteísmo/pq
parasitário/fpH
pecuniário/fpH
perdulário/pfH
periódico/pfH
pleonástico/pfH
politeísmo/pq
político/pfH
possível/pmd
pragmático/fpH
prioritário/pfH
problemático/fHp
provisório/fpH
psicológico/pfH
romântico/pfEOH
satisfatório/pfH
saudável/pm
selvático/fpH
simplicíssimo/pfH
simétrico/pHf
sintático/pfH
sistemático/fpH
solidário/pfH
tecnológico/pfH
telegráfico/fpH
telescópico/fpH
temporário/pfH
teológico/pfH
teísmo/pq
teórico/pfH
topológico/pfH
traumático/fpH
trágico/fpH
tático/fpH
voluntário/fpH
